Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person shall not use a title, term, or abbreviation to imply that the person is
licensed or certified to practice a profession, or otherwise hold himself or herself
out to the public as licensed or certified to practice that profession, unless the
person holds a valid license or certification.
(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed